ru: Конфигурация баллонета: Двойной баллонет; Много баллонетов; Без баллонета; Один баллонет; Другое
ko: 에어포켓 구성: 듀얼 발로넷; 다중 발로넷; 발로넷 없음; 싱글 발로넷; 기타
sl-SI: Konfiguracija baloneta: Dvojni balonet; Več balonetov; Brez baloneta; Enojni balonet; Drugo
bg-BG: Конфигурация на балонетите: Двоен балонет; Множество балонети; Без балонет; Единичен балонет; Друго
zh-CN: 气囊配置: 双副气囊; 多副气囊; 无副气囊; 单副气囊; 其他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia vzduchového vaku: Dvojitý balonet; Viacero balonetov; Bez balonetu; Jeden balonet; Iné
vi: Cấu hình túi khí nhỏ: Hai túi khí; Nhiều túi khí; Không có túi khí; Một túi khí; Khác
fr: Configuration en ballonnet: Double ballonet; Ballonets multiples; Sans ballonet; Ballonet unique; Autre
sv: Ballonetkonfiguration: Dubbel ballonet; Flera balloneter; Ingen ballonet; Enkel ballonet; Övrigt
hr-HR: Konfiguracija unutarnjeg zračnog jastuka: Dvostruki balonet; Višestruki baloneti; Bez baloneta; Jedan balonet; Ostalo
da: Konfiguration af ballonet: Dobbelt ballonet; Flere ballonetter; Ingen ballonet; Enkel ballonet; Andet
de: Ballonet-Konfiguration: Doppelballonett; Mehrere Ballonette; Kein Ballonett; Einzelballonett; Sonstige
pt-PT: Configuração do balonete: Balonete duplo; Balonetes múltiplos; Sem balonete; Balonete único; Outro
nl: Ballonet configuratie: Dubbel ballonet; Meerdere ballonetten; Geen ballonet; Enkel ballonet; Overig
ja: バロネット構造: デュアルバロネット; マルチバロネット; バロネットなし; シングルバロネット; その他
tr: Balonet sistemi konfigürasyonu: Çift balonet; Çoklu balonet; Balonetsiz; Tek balonet; Diğer
cs: Provedení balonetu: Dvojitý balonet; Více balonetů; Bez balonetu; Jeden balonet; Jiné
en: Ballonet configuration: Dual ballonet; Multiple ballonets; No ballonet; Single ballonet; Other
fi: Ballonetin konfiguraatio: Kaksoisballonetti; Useita ballonetteja; Ei ballonettia; Yksittäinen ballonetti; Muu
hu: Ballonett konfigurációja: Két ballonet; Több ballonet; Nincs ballonet; Egy ballonet; Egyéb
nb: Ballonet-konfigurasjon: Dobbel ballonet; Flere balloneter; Ingen ballonet; Enkelt ballonet; Annet
lt-LT: Baloneto konfigūracija: Dvigubas balonetas; Keli balonetai; Be baloneto; Vienas balonetas; Kita
th: รูปแบบของระบบบอลโลเน็ต: บัลโลเนตคู่; บัลโลเนตหลายตัว; ไม่มีบัลโลเนต; บัลโลเนตเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
es: Configuración del globo: Doble balonete; Múltiples balonetes; Sin balonete; Un balonete; Otro
pt-BR: Configuração do balonete: Balonete duplo; Vários balonetes; Sem balonete; Balonete único; Outro
it: Configurazione del pallone: Doppio ballonet; Ballonet multipli; Nessun ballonet; Singolo ballonet; Altro
zh-TW: 副氣囊配置: 雙副氣囊; 多副氣囊; 無副氣囊; 單副氣囊; 其他
pl: Konfiguracja ballonetu: Podwójny balonet; Wiele balonetów; Brak balonetu; Pojedynczy balonet; Inne
ro-RO: Configurația balonetului: Balonet dublu; Balonete multiple; Fără balonet; Un singur balonet; Altele
el: Διαμόρφωση μπαλονιού: Διπλό ρεζερβουάρ αέρα (ballonet); Πολλαπλά ρεζερβουάρ αέρα (ballonets); Χωρίς ρεζερβουάρ αέρα (ballonet); Μονό ρεζερβουάρ αέρα (ballonet); Άλλο